Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB975.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1059.1(a) and (b.1) of Title 8 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1059.1. Completion, filing and publication of auditor's report and financial statement.(a) Report.--The auditors shall complete the annual audit, adjustment and settlement [as soon as possible after the end of the fiscal year] prior to June 30. The auditors shall, within ten days after completing the annual audit, publish once, in at least one newspaper of general circulation, concise financial information prepared or approved by the auditors and consistent with the audited financial statements for total assets, total 1234567891011121314151617181920 liabilities and total net position at the end of the fiscal year and total revenue, total expenses and changes in total net position for that fiscal year and a reference to a place within the borough where copies of the financial statements and accompanying audit report may be examined. If the full financial statements and accompanying audit report are not published, copies shall be supplied to the publishing newspaper when the request for publication is submitted.* * *(b.1) Filing of report and penalties.--The report shall be prepared no later than [90 days after the close of the fiscal year] the last day of June of each year. It shall be the duty of the secretary of the auditors to file a copy of the report with the secretary of the borough, with the clerk of the court of common pleas of the county or the prothonotary under local rules of court, with the Department of Transportation and with the Department of Community and Economic Development [no later than 90 days after the close of the fiscal year] the last day of June of each year. Any secretary of the auditors refusing or willfully neglecting to file the report commits a summary offense. If the failure to file the report within the period specified is due to the failure of any or all of the auditors to prepare the statement upon which the report is to be based, the auditor commits a summary offense.* * *Section 2. Section 11812(a), (b)(2) and (c) of Title 11 are amended to read:§ 11812. Annual reports, publication, filing report with Department of Community and Economic Development and penalty.20250SB0975PN1116 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Annual report.--The chief fiscal officer shall make a report, verified by oath or affirmation to council at a stated meeting in [April] June of each year, of the public accounts of the city and of the trusts in its care for the preceding fiscal year, exhibiting all of the expenditures of the accounts, respectively, and the sources from which the revenue and funds are derived and in what measures the revenue and funds have been disbursed. Each account shall be accompanied by a statement detailing all of the following:(1) The appropriations made by council.(2) The amount drawn and encumbered on each appropriation.(3) The unencumbered balance outstanding to the debit or credit of the appropriation at the close of the fiscal year.(b) Publication.--* * *(2) The concise financial information approved by the independent auditor and consistent with the audited financial statements for total assets, total liabilities and total net position at the end of the fiscal year and total revenue, total expenses and changes in total net position for that fiscal year and a reference to a place within the city where copies of the financial statements and accompanying auditor's report may be examined shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation as required by section 10109 (relating to publication of notices) at least 10 days prior to the [April] meeting scheduled pursuant to subsection (a). If the full financial statements and accompanying auditor's report are not published, copies shall be supplied to the publishing newspaper when the request for publication is submitted.20250SB0975PN1116 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(c) Filing.--The chief fiscal officer shall annually report the financial condition of the city to the Department of Community and Economic Development [within 90 days after the close of the fiscal year] by the last day of June of each year. The report shall be signed and duly verified by the oath of the chief fiscal officer and approved by the independent auditor, as provided above. Any chief fiscal officer appointed by the city refusing or willfully neglecting to file the report shall, upon conviction in a summary proceeding brought by the Department of Community and Economic Development, be sentenced to pay a fine of $5 for each day delayed beyond [90 days] the last day of June and costs. All fines recovered shall be for use by the Commonwealth.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0975PN1116 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516